Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 22 Highways

11-22-1.
Injuring highway boundary markers.

Every person who shall willfully break down, remove, injure, or destroy any monuments, walls, fences, or bounds, erected for the purpose of designating the boundaries of any public highway, shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year or fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500). In addition, any and all costs incurred by the state of Rhode Island due to damages/loss under this section shall be fully reimbursed by the party or parties causing the damage.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-1

; P.L. 1990, ch. 494, § 1.

11-22-2.
Injuries to road signs — Advertising on highway.

A person who willfully or maliciously: (1) displaces, removes, injures, destroys, or places a political advertisement on a mile board, mile stone, danger sign or signal, or guide sign or post, or any inscription on it, lawfully within a public highway; (2) in any manner paints, prints, places, puts, or affixes, or causes to be painted, printed, placed, or affixed, any business, commercial advertisement on or to any stone, tree, fence, stump, pole, building, or other object which is the property of another, without first obtaining the written consent of the owner, or (3) in any manner paints, prints, places, puts, or affixes, or causes to be painted, placed, or affixed, an advertisement on or to any stone, tree, fence, stump, pole, mile board, mile stone, danger sign, danger signal, guide sign, guide post, billboard, building, or other object within the limits of a public highway, without first obtaining the written consent of the chief of police of the city or town in which the highway is located; is punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) days, or both. In addition, the person shall be required to pay any and all expenses incurred in the repair or replacement of the mile board, mile stone, danger sign or signal, or guide sign or post. Any advertisement in or upon a public highway in violation of the provisions of this section may be taken down, removed or destroyed by anyone. Any and all costs incurred by the state of Rhode Island due to damages/loss under this section shall be fully reimbursed by the party or parties causing the damage.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 37; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 41; P.L. 1915, ch. 1203, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 41; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 41; P.L. 1953, ch. 3207, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-2

; P.L. 1976, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 494, § 1.

11-22-3.
Billboards near grade crossings or intersections.

No person, partnership, or corporation shall erect, construct, or maintain any billboard along the line of any public highway or street within three hundred (300) feet of any place where a railroad crosses a public highway or street at grade, nor within a distance of fifty (50) feet of the intersection of any public highway or street. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to apply to the erection, construction, or maintenance of any billboard whenever it shall be erected, constructed, or maintained upon the top of any building or buildings not less than ten (10) feet in height. Any person, partnership, or corporation violating any of the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1075, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 119, §§ 26, 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 376, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-3

.

11-22-4.
Windmills in proximity to highway.

No windmill shall be erected, placed, or continued within twenty-five (25) rods of any traveled street or road.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 125, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 151, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 181, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 385, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-4

.

11-22-5.
Penalty for unlawful windmill.

Every person who shall erect, locate, or run any windmill within twenty-five (25) rods of any traveled street or road shall be fined for every offense not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) nor less than one hundred dollars ($100), one-half (1/2) inuring to the use of the city or town where the offense shall have been committed and one-half (1/2) to the use of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 125, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 151, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 181, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 385, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-5

.

11-22-6.
Removal of unlawful windmills.

The city council of any city and the town council of any town may remove all windmills within their cities and towns respectively that are located, continued, or run contrary to the provisions of §

11-22-4

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 125, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 151, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 181, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 385, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-6

.

11-22-7.
Council authority for location of windmill.

The city council of any city and town council of any town may, upon petition in writing to them presented, authorize or continue the location of any mill in their discretion at any place within the limits of their respective towns.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 125, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 151, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 181, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 385, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-7

.

11-22-8.
Windmills exempt.

The provisions of §§

11-22-4

—

11-22-7

shall not apply to any mill which shall be located by decree of the town council of the town in which it is situated, nor to any mill situated in the towns of New Shoreham or Jamestown, nor to any patented wind engine or mill.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 125, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 151, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 181, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 385, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-8

.

11-22-9.
Letting team go at large.

Every person having charge of any wheel carriage of any kind, or sled or sleigh, with any kind of team, who shall negligently or willfully let the team go at large in any highway, shall be fined five dollars ($5.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 74, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 87, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 99, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 81, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-9

.

11-22-10.
Scattering debris on highway.

Every person who shall knowingly throw or place or cause to be thrown or placed, in or upon any highway, or bridge any tacks, nails, wire, scrap metal, glass, crockery, or other substance injurious to the feet of persons or animals, or to the tires or wheels of bicycles or other vehicles, shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). Any violation shall be heard by the traffic tribunal in accordance with chapter 41.1 of title 31.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 318, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 87, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 99, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 81, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-10

; P.L. 1976, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 325, § 1.

11-22-11.
Testing speed of horse.

Every person who shall drive any horse over any of the public highways, for the purpose of racing or trying the speed of the horse, shall be fined not more than twenty dollars ($20.00) or imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) days.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 74, § 6; P.L. 1901, ch. 925, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 87, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 99, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 81, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-11

.

11-22-12.
Crawford Street Bridge in Providence.

Every person who shall fasten any vessel to any part of Crawford Street Bridge shall forfeit twenty dollars ($20.00) for each offense to the use of city of Providence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 75, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 89, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 101, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 84, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-12

.

11-22-13.
Apponaug River Bridge.

Every person who shall lay any sloop or other vessel to the bridge over Apponaug River, or there load or unload wood or other heavy merchandise, shall forfeit twenty dollars ($20.00) for each offense; one-half (1/2) to the use of the city of Warwick and one-half (1/2) to the use of the person who shall sue for it.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 75, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 89, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 101, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 84, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-13

.

11-22-14.
Pawtuxet Falls bridge.

Every person who shall make fast any canoe or boat to either of the abutments or any part of the bridge at Pawtuxet Falls, or throw any stones off from the bridge, shall forfeit five dollars ($5.00); one-half (1/2) to the use of the city of Warwick and the city of Cranston and one-half (1/2) to the use of the person who shall sue for it. The city of Warwick and the city of Cranston may each appoint one suitable person to take care of the bridge and to prevent damage or injury being done to it. Each of the persons so appointed shall prosecute for every forfeiture incurred under this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 75, §§ 3-5; G.L. 1909, ch. 89, §§ 3-5; G.L. 1923, ch. 101, §§ 3-5; G.L. 1938, ch. 84, §§ 3-5; G.L. 1956, §

11-22-14

.

11-22-15.
Wire strung across highways.

No wire shall be strung across a highway less than fourteen (14) feet above the surface of the highway. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 325, § 1.

11-22-16.
Motorist aid call system — False reports — Damage to equipment.

Any person who willfully gives or causes to be given a false report or false information through the use of a telephone call-box installed along any highway by the department of transportation through its motorist aid call system, or who willfully damages, destroys, or removes any telephone call-box or other equipment of the system, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200). For a second or subsequent conviction under this section, a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be imposed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 290, § 1.